Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.090

Noncertified tribes—Judicial hearing. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1829-S.SL) ***

(1) A peace officer may arrest a person subject to a tribal arrest warrant from a noncertified tribe when the warrant is presented by a tribal court representative or tribal law enforcement officer to the peace officer or a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or entered in the national crime information center interstate identification index. The arrested person must be brought to an appropriate place of detention and then to the nearest available superior court judge without unnecessary delay. The superior court judge shall issue an order continuing custody upon presentation of the tribal arrest warrant.

(2) The judge shall inform the person appearing under subsection (1) of this section of the name of the noncertified tribe that has subjected the person to an arrest warrant, the basis of the arrest warrant, the right to assistance of counsel, and the right to require a judicial hearing before transfer of custody to the applicable noncertified tribe.

(3) After being informed by the judge of the effect of a waiver, the arrested person may waive the right to require a judicial hearing and consent to return to the applicable noncertified tribe by executing a written waiver. If the waiver is executed, the judge shall issue an order to transfer custody under subsection (5) of this section or, with consent of the applicable noncertified tribe, authorize the voluntary return of the person to that tribe.

(4) If a hearing is not waived under subsection (3) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing within three days, excluding weekends and holidays, after the initial appearance. The arrested person and the prosecuting attorney's office shall be informed of the time and place of the hearing. The court shall release the person upon conditions that will reasonably assure availability of the person for the hearing or direct a peace officer to maintain custody of the person until the time of the hearing. Following the hearing, the judge shall issue an order to transfer custody under subsection (5) of this section unless the arrested person established by clear and convincing evidence that the arrested person is not the person identified in the warrant. If the court does not order transfer of custody, the judge shall order the arrested person to be released.

(5) A judicial order to transfer custody issued under subsection (4) of this section shall be directed to a peace officer to take or retain custody of the person until a representative of the applicable noncertified tribe is available to take custody. If the noncertified tribe has not taken custody with [within] three days, excluding weekends and holidays, the court may order the release of the person upon conditions that will assure the person's availability on a specified date with [within] seven days. If the noncertified tribe has not taken custody within the time specified in the order, the person shall be released. Thereafter, an order to transfer custody may be entered only if a new arrest warrant is issued. The court may authorize the voluntary return of the person with the consent of the applicable noncertified tribe.

[ 2024 c 207 s 10.]